Utah statutes.
63M-7-511.5.   Limitation of awards.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an award of reparations may not exceed $25,000 in the aggregate.

(b) (i)  In claims involving homicide, attempted homicide, aggravated assault, or DUI offenses, an award of reparations may not exceed $50,000 in the aggregate.

(ii)  Reparations for nonmedical expenses incurred as a result of the homicide, attempted homicide, aggravated assault, or DUI may not exceed $25,000.

(2) (a)  Awards of reparations to secondary victims shall be paid from the victims' maximum award amount provided in Subsection (1).

(b)  When it appears that allowable expenses for the victim and secondary victims will exceed the maximum award amount provided in Subsection (1), the expenses of the victim shall be paid first unless otherwise requested by the claimant.

(c)  Priority of payment among multiple secondary victims on a single claim shall be determined by the reparations officer.

